cs: Připojení solárních panelů: Krokosvorky; Andersonův napájecí konektor; DC konektor; MC4; SAE; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; XT60; Jiné
en: Solar panel connections: Alligator clips; Anderson powerpole; DC connector; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Other
fi: Aurinkopaneelien kytkennät: Hauenleukakiinnitin; Anderson-napajohdin; DC-liitin; MC4; SAE; USB tyyppi A; USB tyyppi C; XT60; Muu
pt-BR: Conexões do painel solar: Garra modelo jacaré; Conector elétrico Anderson; Conector CC; MC4; SAE; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; XT60; Outro
es: Conexiones de paneles solares: Pinzas de cocodrilo; Poste eléctrico Anderson; Conector DC; MC4; SAE; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; XT60; Otros
lt-LT: Saulės kolektorių jungtys: Gnybtai; „Anderson Powerpole“ jungtys; DC jungtis; MC4; SAE; USB A tipo; USB C tipo; XT60; Kita
ko: 태양 전지판 연결: 악어 클립; 앤더슨 파워폴; DC 커넥터; MC4; SAE; USB 타입-A; USB 타입-C; XT60; 기타
hu: Napelem-csatlakozások: Aligátorkapcsok; Anderson powerpole; DC-csatlakozó; MC4; SAE; USB-A; USB-C; XT60; Egyéb
hr-HR: Priključci solarnih panela: Krokodil-kopče; Anderson Powerpole; DC konektor; MC4; SAE; USB tip-A; USB tip-C; XT60; Ostalo
sv: Anslutningar för solpaneler: Alligatorklämmor; Anderson powerpole; DC-kontakt; MC4; SAE; USB typ-A; USB typ-C; XT60; Annat
nb: Solcellepaneltilkoblinger: Krokodilleklemmer; Anderson powerpole; DC-kontakt; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Annen
zh-CN: 太阳能电池板连接: 鳄鱼夹; 安德森电源杆; DC 连接器; MC4; SAE; USB A 型; USB C 型; XT60; 其他
ru: Подключения солнечных панелей: Зажимы типа «крокодил»; Электроопора Anderson; Разъем постоянного тока; MC4; SAE; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; XT60; Другое
sk-SK: Pripojenia solárnych panelov: Krokosvorky; Anderson konektor; DC konektor; MC4; SAE; USB typu A; USB typu C; XT60; Iné
bg-BG: Свързване на соларни панели: Щипки тип „крокодил“.; Електрически стълб Андерсън; DC конектор; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Други
fr: Connexions des panneaux solaires: Pinces crocodiles; Pôle d’alimentation Anderson; Connecteur DC; MC4; SAE; USB type A; USB type C; XT60; Autre
tr: Güneş paneli bağlantıları: Timsah klipsler; Anderson elektrik direği; DC soket; MC4; SAE; USB A tipi; USB C tipi; XT60; Diğer
pl: Połączenia paneli słonecznych: Zaciski krokodylkowe; Słup energetyczny Andersona; Złącze prądu stałego; MC4; SAE; USB typu A; USB typu C; XT60; Pozostałe
zh-TW: 太陽能板連接: 鱷魚夾; Anderson powerpole; DC 連接器; MC4; SAE; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; XT60; 其他
th: การเชื่อมต่อแผงโซลาร์เซลล์: ปากคีบจระเข้; พาวเวอร์โพลของ Anderson; ขั้วต่อไฟฟ้ากระแสตรง; MC4; SAE; USB Type-A; USB Type-C; XT60; อื่นๆ
it: Collegamenti del pannello solare: Pinze a coccodrillo; Il palo elettrico di Anderson; Connettore DC; MC4; SAE; USB tipo A; USB tipo C; XT60; Altro
de: Anschlüsse des Solarpanels: Krokodilklemmen; Anderson-Strommast; DC-Anschluss; MC4; SAE; USB-Typ-A; USB-Typ-C; XT60; Sonstiges
da: Solpaneltilslutninger: Krokodillenæb; Anderson-powerpole; DC-stik; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Andet
el: Συνδέσεις ηλιακών πάνελ: Κλιπ αλιγάτορα; Άντερσον powerpole; Συνδετήρας DC; MC4; SAE; USB type-C; USB type-C; XT60; Άλλο
sl-SI: Priključki sončnih panelov: Aligator sponke; Anderson powerpole; DC priključek; MC4; SAE; USB tip-A; USB tipa C; XT60; Drugo
pt-PT: Ligações de painel solar: Grampos jacaré; Poste de energia Anderson; Ficha CC; MC4; SAE; USB tipo A; USB type-C; XT60; Outro
nl: Aansluitingen voor zonnepanelen: Krokodillenklemmen; Anderson Powerpole; DC-connector; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Andere
ja: ソーラーパネルの接続: ワニ口クリップ; APP製パワーポール; DCコネクタ; MC4; SAE; USBタイプA; USBタイプC; XT60; その他
ro-RO: Conexiuni panouri solare: Cleme crocodil; Anderson powerpole; Conector DC; MC4; SAE; USB tip A; USB tip C; XT60; Altele
vi: Kết nối bảng điều khiển năng lượng mặt trời: Kẹp cá sấu; Phích cắm Anderson; Đầu nối DC; MC4; SAE; USB type-A; USB type-C; XT60; Khác